Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF883.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.68, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 35b. new text end new text begin Fiber and conduit; broadband and Internet access. new text end new text begin To the extent not exempt under subdivision 35a, fiber and conduit purchased or leased for use directly by a broadband or Internet service provider, primarily in the provision of broadband or Internet access services that are ultimately to be sold at retail, are exempt. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after July 1, 2025. new text end